Massachusetts, session 194th, HD4313.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 12D of Chapter 156C of the General Laws, as so appearing in the
2022 Official Edition, is hereby amended by striking out the following:- “The fee for the filing of
the certificate of organization required by subsection (a) shall be five hundred dollars. The fee
for the filing of the annual report required by subsection (c) shall be five hundred dollars.” and
inserting in place thereof the following words:- “The fee for the filing of the certificate of
organization required by subsection (a) shall be one hundred and fifty dollars. The fee for the
filing of the annual report required by subsection (c) shall be one hundred and fifty dollars.”
of 1